Tennessee, session 114, SB1902.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 42-4-104(b)(2), is amended by
adding the following sentence at the end of the subdivision:
Notice must also be published on the governing body's website for at least two (2) weeks
prior to the date set for the hearing.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1902
010569
- 1 -